Utah statutes.
41-1a-120.   Participation in Uninsured Motorist Identification Database Program.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the division shall provide the Department of Public Safety's designated agent, as defined in Section 41-12a-802, with a record of all current motor vehicle registrations before the seventh and twenty-first day of each calendar month.

(b)  The division is not required to provide the Department of Public Safety's designated agent as defined in Section 41-12a-802 a record of current motor vehicle registrations for vehicles that are registered under Section 41-1a-221, 41-1a-222, or 41-1a-301.

(2)  The division shall perform the duties specified in:

(a)  Title 41, Chapter 12a, Part 8, Uninsured Motorist Identification Database Program; and

(b)  Sections 41-1a-109 and 41-1a-110.

(3)  The division shall cooperate with the Department of Public Safety in making rules and developing procedures to use the Uninsured Motorist Identification Database.



Amended by Chapter 130, 2006 General Session

